Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.902

Effective date—2006 c 265.

This act takes effect July 1, 2006.

[ 2006 c 265 s 604. Formerly RCW 43.215.905.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 43.215.905 was recodified by 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 821, effective July 1, 2018, and decodified by 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 7.